Hawaii statutes.
§831-1 Definition. In this chapter, "felony"
means an offense that is punishable with imprisonment for a term which is in
excess of one year. [L 1969, c 250, pt of §1; HRS §716-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt
of §1; am L 1975, c 14, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next